Utah, session 2026, SB326.
Section 1. Section 53G-4-203 is amended to read:53G-4-203. Election of officers -- Terms -- Time of election -- Removal of officers -- Quorum requirements.(1)AExcept as provided in Subsection (6), a local school board shall elect a president and a vice president whose terms of office are for two years and until their successors are elected.(2)The elections shall be held during the first local school board meeting in January following a regular local school board election held in the district.(3)An officer appointed or elected by a local school board may be removed from office for cause by a vote of two-thirds of the local school board.(4)When a vacancy occurs in the office of president or vice president of the local school board for any reason, a replacement shall be elected for the unexpired term.(5)Attendance of a simple majority of the local school board members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of official business.(6)In relation to a local school board of a new school district, the local school board may set the initial terms of a president and vice president to be as follows:(a)the remainder of the calendar year in which the president or vice president is sworn in as a member of the local school board, plus one additional calendar year; or(b)the remainder of the calendar year in which the president or vice president is sworn in as a member of the local school board, plus three additional calendar years.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.